Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-402.03
Life insurance; reserves; separate accounts; investment; transfer.

(1) Except as may be provided with respect to reserves for guaranteed benefits, amounts allocated to any separate account and accumulations thereon may be invested and reinvested without regard to any requirements or limitations prescribed by the laws of this state governing the investments of life insurance companies and the investments in such separate account or accounts shall not be taken into account in applying investment limitations otherwise applicable to investments of such company.

(2) No investment in such separate accounts or in the domestic life insurance company's general investment account shall be transferred by sale, exchange, substitution, or otherwise from one account to another unless the director approves such transfer or unless the director has not disapproved the application for transfer within thirty days from filing. The application to transfer investments shall be on a form provided by the director.

Laws 1972, LB 771, § 3;

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 62.